New York, session 2025-2026, A8455.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new article 16 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 16 4 MUNICIPAL PARKLAND ALIENATION 5 Section 16.01 Definitions. 6 16.03 Parkland alienation reporting. 7 16.05 Parkland alienation enforcement. 8 § 16.01 Definitions. When used in this article: 9 1. "Municipal parkland" shall mean real property or interests therein 10 that is owned by a municipality that provides public park, recreation, 11 or open space protection purposes. Municipal parkland includes: lands 12 that have been dedicated for such purposes by the municipality through a 13 formal resolution or similar action; lands that have been purchased or 14 accepted for such purposes; or lands that currently or historically have 15 been available to and used by the public for such purposes. 16 2. "Municipal parkland alienation" shall mean any action by a munici- 17 pality to sell, lease, discontinue, or change the use of municipal park- 18 land. 19 3. "Municipality" shall mean a county, town, city, or village. It 20 shall also mean a school district or other political subdivision in 21 instances where such entity has obtained state or federal grant funding 22 for the creation of municipal parkland. 23 4. "Parkland alienation legislation" shall mean legislation introduced 24 in the state legislature authorizing a municipality to alienate parkland 25 under its jurisdiction. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00429-01-5 A. 8455 2 1 § 16.03 Parkland alienation reporting. Any municipality that has 2 received alienation authorization through enactment of municipal park- 3 land alienation legislation shall submit a report to the office no later 4 than December thirty-first of the calendar year following the enactment 5 of the legislation. Such report shall be signed by the municipality's 6 chief executive officer and shall include: 7 1. A narrative description of the status of the parkland alienation 8 actions authorized and required in the legislation; and 9 2. (a) An attestation that the municipality has complied with all 10 conditions of the parkland alienation legislation, including the dedi- 11 cation of any required replacement parkland or, in the case of utility 12 easements, the dedication of funding for the acquisition of additional 13 parkland or capital improvements to existing parkland facilities; or 14 (b) In the event that any condition of the parkland alienation legis- 15 lation has not been fully complied with, the municipality shall provide 16 the office with an interim report detailing the status of its actions 17 and an explanation as to why certain conditions have not been met, along 18 with the anticipated date by which such conditions will be met. The 19 municipality shall continue to file interim reports annually until such 20 time as the conditions have been met and a final report is filed. 21 Unless a longer time period is specified in the legislation authorizing 22 the alienation, if the conditions of the alienation have not been met by 23 December thirty-first of the third calendar year following the enactment 24 of parkland alienation legislation, the municipality shall be subject to 25 enforcement pursuant to section 16.05 of this article. 26 § 16.05 Parkland alienation enforcement. An action for injunctive 27 relief as provided in this section against a municipality violating any 28 provision of this article may be brought by the attorney general upon 29 referral by the office or upon their own initiative. A municipality may 30 be enjoined from alienating parkland where it acts or has acted in 31 furtherance of parkland alienation without compliance with the require- 32 ments of this article, including reporting requirements and parkland 33 alienation legislation requirements. 34 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 35 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately 36 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 37 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 38 authorized to be made and completed on or before such date.